Massachusetts, session 194th, S2419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 85 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting in line 88 after the word “prohibited” the following line:-
“The department’s manual must indicate that where pedestrians who walk slower than
3.5 feet per second, or pedestrians who use wheelchairs, routinely use the crosswalk, a walking
speed of less than 3.5 feet per second should be considered in determining the pedestrian
clearance time. The department will be responsible for promulgating regulations that direct a
municipality to:
(a.) create a list of locations within their boundaries that are heavily used by pedestrians
who are likely to have: (i.) a walking speed lower than 3.5 feet per second as determined by
current research, (ii.) a slower than average walking speed due to a physical mobility issue, and
(iii.) slower walking speeds resulting from transporting, assisting, or conveying another person
through a signalized crosswalk.
of 2

(b.) require that locations contained in said list, where there are signalized crosswalks
regularly in use, account for the slower walking speed of pedestrians by adjusting signal walk
clearance times to a reasonable degree to allow for pedestrians to safely complete a crossing."
of 2